California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) In addition to the reporting and notification obligations the health authority has under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, the chief executive officer or director of the health authority shall immediately notify the department, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the members of the governing board of the health authority in writing of any fact or facts that, in the chief executive officer’s or director’s reasonable and prudent judgment, is likely to result in the health authority being unable to meet its financial obligations to health care providers or to other parties. Written notice shall describe the fact or facts, the anticipated fiscal consequences, and the actions that will be taken to address the anticipated consequences.

(4) The Department of Managed Health Care shall not waive or vary, nor shall the department request the Department of Managed
 Health Care to waive or vary, the tangible net equity requirements for a health authority under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 after three years from the date of commencement of capitated payments to the health authority. Until the time the health authority is in compliance with all of the tangible net equity requirements under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care promulgated thereunder, the health authority shall develop a stop-loss program appropriate to the risks of the health authority. The program shall be satisfactory to both the department and the Department of Managed Health Care.

(5) In the event that the health authority votes to file a petition of bankruptcy, or the board of supervisors notifies the department of its intent to terminate the health authority, the department shall immediately convert the authority’s Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries to either of the following:

(A) To other managed care contractors when available, provided those contractors are able to demonstrate that they can absorb the increased enrollment without detriment to the provision of health care services to their existing enrollees.

(B) To the extent that other managed care contractors are unavailable or the department determines that the action is otherwise in the best interest of any particular beneficiary, to a fee-for-service reimbursement system pending the availability of managed care contractors, provided those contractors are able to demonstrate that they can absorb the increased enrollment without detriment to the provision of health care services to their existing enrollees, or if the department determines that providing care to any particular beneficiary pursuant to a fee-for-service reimbursement system is no longer
 necessary to protect the continuity of care or other interests of the beneficiary. Beneficiary eligibility for Medi-Cal shall not be affected by this action. Beneficiaries who have been or who are scheduled to be converted to a fee-for-service reimbursement system or managed care contractor may make a choice to be enrolled in another managed care system, if one is available, in full compliance with the federal freedom-of-choice requirements.

(6) The health authority shall submit to a review of financial records when the department determines, based on data reported by the health authority or otherwise, that the health authority will not be able to meet its financial obligations to health care providers contracting with the health authority. Where the review of financial records determines that the health authority will not be able to meet its financial obligations to contracting health care providers for the provision of health care services,
 the director shall immediately terminate the contract between the health authority and the state, and immediately convert the health authority Medi-Cal beneficiaries in accordance with paragraph (5) in order to ensure uninterrupted provision of health care services to the beneficiaries and to minimize financial disruption to providers. The action of the director shall be the final administrative determination. Beneficiary eligibility for Medi-Cal shall not be affected by this action. Beneficiaries who have been or who are scheduled to be converted under paragraph (5) may make a choice to be enrolled in another managed care plan, if one is available, in full compliance with federal freedom-of-choice requirements.

(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall implement Medi-Cal capitated enrollments in a manner that ensures that appropriate levels of health care services will be provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and that
 appropriate levels of administrative services will be furnished to health care providers. The contract between the department and the health authority shall authorize and permit the department to administer the number of covered Medi-Cal enrollments in such a manner that the health authority’s provider network and administrative structure are able to provide appropriate and timely services to beneficiaries and to participating providers.

(8) In the event a health authority is terminated, files for bankruptcy, or otherwise no longer functions for the purpose for which it was established, the county shall, with respect to compensation for provision of health care services to beneficiaries, occupy no greater or lesser status than any other health care provider in the disbursement of assets of the health authority.

(9) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impair or
 diminish the authority of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, nor shall anything in this section be construed to reduce or otherwise limit the obligation of a health authority licensed as a health care service plan to comply with the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care promulgated thereunder.

(u) In the event a health authority may no longer function for the purposes for which it is established, at the time the health authority’s then-existing obligations have been satisfied or the health authority’s assets have been exhausted, the board of supervisors may, by ordinance, terminate the health authority.

(v) (1) Prior to the termination of the health authority, the board of
 supervisors shall notify the department of its intent to terminate the health authority. The department shall conduct an audit of the health authority’s records within 30 days of the notification to determine the liabilities and assets of the health authority.

(2) The department shall report its findings to the board within 10 days of completion of the audit. The board shall prepare a plan to liquidate or otherwise dispose of the assets of the health authority and to pay the liabilities of the health authority to the extent of the health authority’s assets, and present the plan to the department within 30 days upon receipt of these findings.

(w) Any assets of the health authority shall be disposed of pursuant to provisions contained in the contract entered into between the state and the health authority pursuant to this section.

(x) Upon termination of a health authority by the board, the county shall manage any remaining assets of the health authority until superseded by a department-approved plan. Any liabilities of the health authority shall not become obligations of the county upon either the termination of the health authority or the liquidation or disposition of the health authority’s remaining assets.

(y) This section shall apply to any county health authority or any county special commission operating under this article or Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), except to the extent that this section conflicts with Sections 14087.31, 14087.35, and 14087.36 or Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 12.4.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.385.

(a) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Board” means the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento.

(2) “County” means the County of Sacramento.

(3) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) “Health authority” means a separate public entity established by the board that meets the requirements of state and federal law and criteria established by the department and engages in activities authorized by this section.

(b) The
 Legislature finds and declares that it is necessary that a health authority be established in the county to meet the problems of delivery of publicly assisted medical care in the county and to demonstrate ways of promoting timely access, quality care, and cost efficiency.

(c) A health authority established by the board, consistent with Section 14087.38, may do all of the following:

(1) Designate a number of Knox-Keene licensed health plans for purposes of the department’s Medi-Cal managed care plan procurement under Section 14089 for the County of Sacramento as specified under subdivision (d), until the health authority implements a county-sponsored local initiative health plan as authorized by Section 14087.38 as described in paragraph (3).

(2) Meet with health plans that operate as Medi-Cal managed care plans in
 the county pursuant to Section 14089 to review and discuss strategies for improving quality, cost, and access of Medi-Cal services in the county, until the health authority implements any activity described in paragraph (3).

(3) (A) Consistent with Section 14087.38, and upon approval of the health authority and the board, pursue either of the following activities:

(i) Seek and obtain Knox-Keene health plan licensure in order to serve as the county-sponsored local initiative to contract with the department to arrange for the provision of health care services to qualifying individuals, as authorized by Section 14087.3.

(ii) Negotiate and enter into a contract with a Knox-Keene licensed health plan to be the designated county-sponsored local initiative health plan for the purpose of contracting
 with the department for the provision of health care services to qualifying individuals as authorized by Section 14087.3.

(B) Upon the implementation of any activity described in subparagraph (A), the county may continue to administer its stakeholder advisory committee, as described under Section 14089.07.

(d) (1) For purposes of the designation of health plans pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), prior to procurement under Section 14089, the health authority shall meet with any health plans intending to contract with the department as Medi-Cal managed care plans in the county. Any health plan intending to contract with the department as a Medi-Cal managed care plan in the county, and intending to submit a proposal to the department in a procurement process, shall first be required to meet with the health authority.

(2) Subsequent to meeting with all interested health plans, the health authority shall designate to the department at least two Knox-Keene licensed health plans for the department’s approval based on the criteria described in paragraph (3).

(3) Any criteria used by the health authority to determine the designation of health plans pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall not conflict with requirements for Medi-Cal managed care plans established by the department, the Department of Managed Health Care, the federal Medicaid program, or state law, and shall conform with any guidance issued by the department pursuant to paragraph (7). Designation requirements imposed by the health authority shall further the department’s goals and requirements for procurement under Section 14089 including, but not limited to, increased quality, access, network adequacy, reduction of health
 disparities, and integration of behavioral and oral health within the delivery of health care services in the Medi-Cal program.

(4) Notwithstanding any designation by the health authority, only health plans approved by the department as meeting plan procurement requirements determined by the department shall be eligible to contract with the department as Medi-Cal managed care plans in the county. Designation by the health authority provides the health plan only with the opportunity to compete in the procurement process under Section 14089 and does not guarantee the award of a Medi-Cal managed care plan contract with the department.

(5) If the health authority does not designate at least two health plans that receive approval from the department, the department shall determine other health plans to contract with as Medi-Cal managed care plans to ensure there are at least two
 Medi-Cal managed care plans in Sacramento County.

(6) Designation of health plans by the health authority shall continue for the term of the Medi-Cal contract, unless the department determines that the criteria for designation specified in paragraph (3) is no longer met.

(7) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of letters or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. This may include, but need not be limited to, guidance to the health authority with respect to the requisite criteria and timing for the designation of health plans pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 446, Sec. 1.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.39.

(a) In any transfer of functions from county employees to a health authority established pursuant to Section 14087.35, 14087.36, or 14087.38, the health authority shall continue to recognize the employee organization that represented the employees performing those functions at the time of the transfer of duties.

(b) Any health authority to which this section applies shall be bound by the terms of any memorandum of understanding that is in effect as of the date of the transfer of functions for the
 duration of the transfer of functions, or until replaced by a subsequent memorandum of understanding between the health authority and the employee organization.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to administrative functions performed by the authority that are directly related to the operation of a health care service plan licensed under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code, unless the functions were transferred from county employees to the authority.

(d) In order to further the statewide interest in the development of an effective managed care delivery system to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the county, it is necessary to ensure that the public health and hospital facilities of the county are financially viable so that the county may participate in that delivery system through the use of those facilities. Accordingly, notwithstanding
 any provision of the county charter to the contrary, the county shall be fully authorized to offer and provide medical care to members of the health service system of the county at the public health and hospital facilities of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 642, Sec. 7.   Effective September 20, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.4.

(a) Any contract made pursuant to this article may be renewed if the provider continues to meet the requirements of this chapter, regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, and the contract. Failure to meet these requirements shall be cause for nonrenewal of the contract. The department may condition renewal on timely completion of a mutually agreed upon plan of correction of any deficiencies.

(b) The department may terminate or decline to renew a contract, in whole or in
 part, when the director determines that such action is necessary to protect the health of the beneficiaries or the funds appropriated to carry out the Medi-Cal program. Nonrenewal or termination under this article shall not qualify the applicant for an administrative hearing including a hearing pursuant to Section 14123.

(c) In order to achieve maximum cost savings the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this article is necessary. Therefore contracts under this article shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) For any contract entered into pursuant to this article, the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care shall, at the director’s request and with all due haste, grant an exemption from the provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing
 with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of carrying out the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.41.

The department shall develop a simple form, consistent with the notice requirements of Sections 51014.1 and 51014.2 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, for Medi-Cal managed care plans to use to notify a Medi-Cal enrollee of a denial, termination, delay, or modification in benefits. The department shall require all Medi-Cal managed care plans to use the form as a condition of participation in Medi-Cal managed care pursuant to any contract negotiated after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 539, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.45.

The provisions of this article shall not become operative until July 1, 1983, the date upon which the California Medical Assistance Commission, created pursuant to Assembly Bill 3480, assumes its full responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 18.   Effective June 30, 1982.   Section operative July 1, 1983, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.46.

(a) The department shall implement a dental managed care program for Medi-Cal beneficiaries to achieve major cost savings, while ensuring access and quality of care, pursuant to this section.

(b) The department shall issue a request for proposals and award contracts on a competitive basis to one or more dental health care service contractors licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) in each county or region that the department determines to be feasible. The department may contract with county organized health systems.

(c) To ensure access and continuity of care, the department
 shall award contracts to plans that agree to negotiate in good faith and subcontract with any provider who agrees to provide dental services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries at a reimbursement rate comparable to that paid by the plan to other participating providers. A plan shall contract whenever feasible with traditional and safety net providers of dental services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries. In evaluating the plans, the department shall assign favorable weighting to contractors that include traditional and safety net providers.

(d) The department shall implement a process to inform each Medi-Cal beneficiary of their choice of participating dentists and to allow a beneficiary to choose or change their participating dentist.

(e) The department shall make every effort to achieve operational contracts to place Medi-Cal beneficiaries in dental managed care by October 1, 1995. The department
 may determine which counties or categories of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are to be included in the dental managed care program. If the department has achieved one or more operational managed care contracts in a county or region, fee-for-service dental services shall not be an option for selection by a beneficiary, except that the department may provide for fee-for-service dental care if needed to ensure adequate access in rural or underserved areas, or for unique populations.

(f) The department shall require a participating plan to provide, at a minimum, the full scope of dental benefits pursuant to state and federal law.

(g) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code.

(h) A Medi-Cal beneficiary shall be able to receive their dental care from federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics certified pursuant to Public Law 95-210 that provide dental care in their service area. At the time of informing the Medi-Cal beneficiary of their choice of participating dentists, the beneficiary shall be informed of this option. Federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics shall continue to be reimbursed for dental services through the medical payment system in accordance with federal regulations.

(i) The department shall monitor the implementation of dental managed care, and for each of the first three years of implementation, shall annually evaluate the program on a county-by-county basis in terms of access, quality of care, and cost savings. The evaluation shall be provided to the Legislature within 120 days of the close of each of
 the three fiscal years.

(j) The department shall seek federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation in the program implemented pursuant to this section. This article shall not be implemented unless and until the director has executed a declaration, to be retained by the director, that approval of all necessary federal waivers have been obtained by the department.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained, the department shall extend the dental managed care contracts, which are in effect on the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, for the provision of covered dental services authorized under this section pursuant to all of the following:

(1) These existing contracts shall be extended through December
 31, 2023, or through the calendar day immediately preceding the effective date for the new dental managed care contracts described in paragraph (3), to the extent that effective date is later than January 1, 2024.

(2) Contract extensions shall be secured on a sole source basis.

(3) The department shall conduct a competitive bid and procurement process to award new dental managed care contracts, commencing on an effective date of January 1, 2024, subject to the department obtaining all necessary federal approvals for the contracts.

(4) If new dental managed care contracts have not taken effect on or before July 1, 2024, the department shall provide an update to the Legislature detailing the specific circumstances that contributed to the delay and an expected commencement date for the new contracts.

(5) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(l) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of information notices, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 88.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.47.

(a) The department may contract under this article with the Counties of Sonoma, Placer, and San Luis Obispo, which have been selected by the department through a request for proposal process, for the operation of a fee-for-service managed care program administered by the county through which primary care, specialty care, and case management are provided to residents of the county who are Medi-Cal eligible persons designated by the director.

(b) (1) Upon
 receipt of the necessary federal medicaid freedom of choice waivers, the department may, consistent with the federal waivers, assign to a fee-for-service managed care program residents of the county who are Medi-Cal eligible persons with Medi-Cal aid codes designated by the director. The department may require that assigned beneficiaries receive their Medi-Cal services and case management through the program.

(2) Medi-Cal eligible county residents who are dually eligible for Medi-Cal and Medicare benefits shall not, however, be assigned to a fee-for-service managed care program.

(3) Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible for benefits through age, blindness, or disability, as defined in Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et. seq.) shall be assigned to a fee-for-service managed care program. However, each county participating in the program authorized by this section
 shall allow these beneficiaries to select a provider or providers of their choice and shall ensure that existing provider-patient relationships are permitted to continue.

(4) Services covered by the California Children’s Services program shall not be incorporated into a fee-for-service managed care program in a manner that is inconsistent with Article 2.98 (commencing with Section 14094).

(5) A foster child may be enrolled voluntarily in a fee-for-service managed care program if the county director of social services, or his or her delegated representative, makes an individual determination that enrollment in a fee-for-service managed care program is in the best interest of the child. In determining what is in the best interest of the foster child, the county director of social services, or his or her delegated representative, shall consult with the child’s caretaker, and shall
 include the decision of whether or not to enroll the child in a fee-for-service managed care program in the child’s case plan provided for pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11400.

(c) Each contract entered into by the department under this section may have an initial term of up to three years. Contracts may be renewed for periods of up to three years upon a determination by the department that a contract is successful.

(d) The department shall periodically evaluate each fee-for-service managed care program through an independent assessment as required under the department’s approved federal waiver request to determine if the program is successfully providing quality health care while not placing the Medi-Cal program or counties at additional financial risk. The assessment shall evaluate quality of care, access, the provision of preventive health care, and costs. The
 department shall terminate a contract when the department finds that the fee-for-service managed care program is unsuccessful.

(e) In order to ensure maximum cost effectiveness, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts entered into under this section between the department and the counties is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this article shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. 

(f) Fee-for-service managed care program contractors shall ensure broad participation of primary care and other providers, including specialists, safety net and traditional Medi-Cal providers, in the program and shall contract with any primary care provider that agrees to provide services in accord with the same terms and conditions that the fee-for-service managed care program
 contractor requires of other primary care providers. To the extent possible, the fee-for-service managed care program contractor shall contract with primary care providers in a manner that minimizes the disruption of existing relationships between Medi-Cal eligible residents and their primary care providers.

(g) Medi-Cal eligible county residents in the aid codes designated by the director shall be informed about the fee-for-service managed care program through the health care options process established by the department in each county in which the program is operated consistent with the health care options process authorized in other Medi-Cal managed care counties designated by the director.

(h) Designated Medi-Cal residents shall have the right to select a primary care provider from among the primary care providers contracting with the fee-for-service managed care program
 contractor and to change primary care providers. Covered Medi-Cal residents shall be informed of this right and the selection and change processes through the health care options process established in the county by the department consistent with the health care options process authorized in other Medi-Cal managed care counties designated by the director. The fee-for-service managed care program contractor shall also include this information in its membership materials.

(i) The board of supervisors of each county participating in the project authorized by this section shall establish or cause to be established an advisory committee comprised of county, physician, hospital, clinic, and beneficiary representatives to advise the county on the implementation and operation of the project provided for under this section.

(j) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section
 in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of any emergency regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect for no more than 120 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 834, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.48.

(a) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088), or Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), or pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 14200), or Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8.

(b) Before a Medi-Cal managed care plan commences operations based upon an action of the director that expands the geographic area of Medi-Cal managed care, the
 department shall perform an evaluation to determine the readiness of any affected Medi-Cal managed care plan to commence operations. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan demonstrates the ability to provide reliable service utilization and cost data, including, but not limited to, quarterly financial reports, audited annual reports, utilization reports of medical services, and encounter data.

(2) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan has an adequate provider network, including, but not limited to, the location, office hours, and language capabilities of primary care physicians and, if applicable, nonphysician medical practitioners, specialists, pharmacies, and hospitals, that the types of specialists in the provider network are based on the population makeup and particular geographic
 needs, and that whether requirements will be met for availability of services and travel distance standards, as set forth in Sections 53852 and 53885, respectively, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan has developed procedures for the monitoring and improvement of quality of care, including, but not limited to, procedures for retrospective reviews which include patterns of practice reviews and drug prescribing practice reviews, utilization management mechanisms to detect both under- and over-utilization of health care services, and procedures that specify timeframes for medical authorization.

(4) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan has demonstrated the ability to meet accessibility standards in accordance with Section 1300.67.2 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations, including, but not
 limited to, procedures for appointments, waiting times, telephone procedures, after hours calls, urgent care, and arrangement for the provision of unusual specialty services.

(5) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan has met all standards and guidelines established by the department that demonstrate readiness to provide services to enrollees.

(6) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan has submitted all required contract deliverables to the department, including, but not limited to, quality improvement systems, utilization management, access and availability, member services, member grievance systems, and enrollments and disenrollments.

(7) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s Evidence of Coverage, Member Services Guide, or both, conforms to federal and state statutes and
 regulations, is accurate, and is easily understood.

(8) The extent to which the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s primary care and facility sites have been reviewed and evaluated by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 684, Sec. 3.   (SB 494)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.8. County Health Systems [14087.5. - 14087.95.]

14087.5.

(a) The California Medical Assistance Commission may negotiate exclusive contracts with any county that seeks to provide, or arrange for the provision of, the health care services provided under this chapter. The California Medical Assistance Commission shall establish regulations concerning the time for submittal of proposed plans for a contract by a county, and for the time by which the California Medical Assistance Commission shall decide whether or not to accept the county’s proposal.

(b) The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation in expenditures under this article. This article shall not be
 implemented until all necessary waivers have been approved by the federal government.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other provision of law, on and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the department shall have exclusive authority to negotiate the rates, terms, and conditions of county organized health systems contracts and contract amendments under this article or under Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8. As of that date, all references in this article to the negotiator or the California Medical Assistance Commission shall mean the department.

(2) For contracts executed pursuant to this article, the department shall disclose, upon request, each negotiated contract or contract amendment executed by
 both parties after July 1, 2007, which shall be considered public records for the purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section
 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), including contracts that reveal the department’s rates of payment for health care services, the rates themselves, and rate manuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 441.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.51.

(a) It is necessary that a special commission be established in San Mateo County and in any other county designated by the California Medical Assistance Commission in order to meet the problems of the delivery of publicly assisted medical care in the counties and to demonstrate ways of promoting quality care and cost efficiency.

(b) The Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County and of the designated counties may, by ordinance, establish commissions to do any or all of the
 following:

(1) Negotiate the exclusive contracts specified in Section 14087.5 and to arrange for the provision of health care services provided pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Enter into contracts for the provision of health care services to subscribers in the Healthy Families Program.

(3) Enter into agreements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) In addition to the authority specified in subdivision (b), the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County may, by ordinance, authorize the commission established pursuant to this section to provide health care delivery systems for any or all of the following persons:

(1) Persons who are
 eligible to receive medical benefits under this chapter in the county, including, but not limited to, persons who are eligible through federal waiver or a pilot project.

(2) Persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under both Title 18 and Title 19 of the federal Social Security Act.

(3) Persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under Title 18 of the federal Social Security Act.

(4) Persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under publicly supported programs if the commission and participating providers acting pursuant to subcontracts with the commission agree to hold harmless the beneficiaries of the publicly supported programs if the contract between the sponsoring government agency and the commission does not ensure sufficient funding to cover program costs.

(5) Other individuals or groups in the service area, including, but not limited to, public agencies, private businesses, and uninsured or indigent persons. The commission shall not use any payment or reserve from the Medi-Cal program for purposes of this paragraph.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commission established pursuant to this section from providing services pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) in counties other than the commission’s county if the commission is approved by the Department of Managed Health Care to provide services in those counties. The commission shall not use any payment or reserve from the Medi-Cal program for purposes of this subdivision.

(e) If the board of supervisors elects to enact an ordinance pursuant to this section, all rights, powers, duties, privileges, and
 immunities vested in a county by an article shall be vested in the county commission. Any reference in this article to “county” shall mean a commission established pursuant to this section.

(f) The enabling ordinance shall specify the membership of the county commission, the qualifications for individual members, and any other matters as the board of supervisors deems necessary or convenient for the conduct of the county commission’s activities. A commission so established shall be considered a public entity for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code. All commissioners shall be appointed by majority vote of the board of supervisors and shall serve at the pleasure thereof. The board of supervisors may appoint no more than two of its own members to serve on the commission.

(g) As an alternative to establishing a separate commission,